Mississippi, session 2026, HB474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the "Natural Resource Camp Pilot Program Act of 2026." SECTION 2. (1)  There is established for the students of Lee and Monroe counties a Natural Resource Camp pilot program.  The program shall be for the purpose of teaching students the importance of the soil, water, plants, animals and air; the need to maintain a healthy environment; and the importance of land ownership and the wealth that is obtained through owning property. (2)  The program shall be administered jointly by the boards of supervisors of Lee and Monroe counties. (3)  The program shall be implemented within sixty (60) days after the effective date of this act and shall continue for three (3) years, subject to the availability of funds appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose, or funds received by the counties as a gift, donation or bequest for such purposes. SECTION 3.  By July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter for the duration of the pilot program, the boards of supervisors of Lee and Monroe counties shall prepare and submit to the Legislature a report of the data collected on the status of the program.  The report shall include: (a)  The number of students involved in the program; (b)  The number of staff required to implement and operate the program; (c)  The cost of operating the program; (d)  An analysis of the effectiveness of the program; (e)  Recommendations to improve the program; and (f)  Projections as to the cost of implementing and expanding the pilot program to a permanent program to meet the needs of the entire state. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.